en: Business & Industrial > Forestry & Logging > Arborist Accessories: Throw Weights
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Горско стопанство и дърводобив > Аксесоари за арбористи: Тежести за арбористи
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Lâm nghiệp & Khai thác gỗ > Phụ kiện cho kiểm lâm: Tạ ném
sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Gozdarstvo in sečnja > Dodatki za arboriste: Uteži za metanje vrvi
es: Economía e industria > Ingeniería forestal e industria maderera > Accesorios para arbolistas: Bolsas de peso
fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Metsänhoito ja hakkuut > Arboristin tarvikkeet: Kiipeilypainot
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 林業伐木 > 樹藝師用品: 豆袋
cs: Obchod a průmysl > Lesnictví a těžba dřeva > Arboristické potřeby: Vrhací závaží
tr: İş ve Endüstri > Ormancılık ve Kerestecilik > Ağaç Uzmanı Aksesuarları: Ağırlık Atma
sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Lesníctvo a ťažba dreva > Príslušenstvo pre arboristov: Vrhacie vrecká
nb: Forretninger og industri > Skogbruk og tømmer > Arboristutstyr: Kastevekter
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Silvicultura e corte de madeira > Acessórios para arboristas: Pesos de arremesso
hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Šumarstvo i sječa > Pribor za arboriste: Kugle za bacanje
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Miškininkystė ir medienos ruoša > Aksesuarai arboristams: Svaidomieji svareliai
ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 임업/벌목 > 수목관리 전문가 부대용품: 던지기용 무게추
ja: ビジネス・産業 > 林業・伐採 > 樹木医用品: スローウェイト
it: Commercio e industria > Selvicoltura e tagli alberi > Accessori per arboricoltori: Pesi da lancio
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Forst- & Holzwirtschaft > Zubehör für Baumpfleger: Wurfgewichte
fr: Entreprise et industrie > Foresterie et exploitation des forêts > Accessoires pour arboriculteurs: Poids à lancer
nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Bosbouw en houthakken > Accessoires voor boomverzorgers: Werpgewichten
da: Erhverv og industri > Skovdrift og skovarbejde > Arborist-tilbehør: Kastevægte
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Leśnictwo i pozyskiwanie drewna > Akcesoria arborystyczne: Obciążniki do rzucania
zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 林业与伐木业 > 树艺师配件: 投掷器械
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Silvicultură și exploatare forestieră > Accesorii pentru arboricultori: Saci lestați pentru frânghii
hu: Üzlet és ipar > Erdészet és fakitermelés > Arborista-kiegészítők: Dobósúlyok
th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > ป่าไม้และการทำไม้ > อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับรุกขกร: ถุงถ่วงน้ำหนัก
sv: Företag och industri > Skogsbruk och skogsavverkning > Arboristverktyg: Kastvikter
pt-PT: Business e industrial > Silvicultura e indústria madeireira > Acessórios de arboricultor: Pesos de arremesso
ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Лесоводство и лесозаготовки > Аксессуары для арбористов: Мешочки для заброски веревки
el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Δασοκομία & υλοτομία > Αξεσουάρ δενδροκόμων: Βάρη ρίψης